Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-209
Distributor, defined.

Distributor shall mean any person who purchases or otherwise obtains bingo equipment from a licensed manufacturer to sell, lease, distribute, or otherwise provide in this state to a licensed organization or licensed commercial lessor for use in a bingo occasion regulated by the Nebraska Bingo Act.

Laws 1983, LB 259, § 8;

Laws 1984, LB 949, § 14;

R.S.Supp.,1984, § 9-140.04;

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 10;

Laws 1988, LB 929, § 1;

Laws 1989, LB 767, § 6;

Laws 1994, LB 694, § 12.